src/morphology/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
!! Quantifier inflection
!! ---------------
!! The Võro language quantifiers inflect in cases.

!35
!ütsʼ:üt
LEXICON NUM_35ÜTSʼ
+Num+Card:sʼ FRONT_SG-NOM ;
+Num+Card:e FRONT_SG-GEN_ZERO-STEM ;
+Num+Card:e%^Pen%^StrGStem FRONT_SG-PAR_ZERO ;


!49
!kuusʼ:kuud
LEXICON NUM_20KUUSʼ
+Num+Card:%^D2Sʼ BACK_SG-NOM  ;
+Num+Card:%^WGStem%>õ BACK_SG-GEN_ZERO-STEM  ;
+Num+Card:%^StrD2T BACK_SG-PAR_t  ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
